Massachusetts, session 194th, H360.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (a) of section 1 of chapter 301 of the acts of 2014 is hereby
amended by striking out the words “sections 4 and 5” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- section 2.
SECTION 2. Section 2 of said chapter 301 is hereby amended by striking out subsection
(a) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
(a) One license for the sale of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises and 2
licenses for the sale of wines and malt beverages to be drunk on the premises, pursuant to section
12 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, shall be allocated to the area known as TOD West which
consists of all parcels inside the following boundaries: beginning at the intersection of Chestnut
street and Lyman street, southeasterly along the centerline of Lyman street to the intersection
with the centerline of High street; southwesterly along the centerline of High street to the
of 2

intersection of Hampden street; southeasterly along the centerline of Hampden street to the
intersection with the centerline of an alley between parcels 013-03-005 and 013-03-007;
southwesterly along the centerline of said alley, to the intersection of the centerline of John
street; from the intersection of John street to the centerline of Murray court; southwesterly along
the centerline of Murray court to the intersection of the centerline of Dwight street; southeasterly
along the centerline of Dwight street to the intersection with the centerline of Heritage street;
southwesterly along the centerline of Heritage street to its intersection with the centerline of
Appleton street; southeasterly along the centerline of Appleton street to the intersection of the
centerline of Nick Cosmos way; southwesterly along the centerline of Nick Cosmos way to the
intersection of Cabot street; thence from the centerline of Cabot street northwesterly to the
centerline of Commercial street; southwesterly along the centerline of Commercial street to the
intersection of the centerline of Hampshire street; northwesterly along the centerline of
Hampshire street to the intersection of the centerline of Chestnut street; northeasterly along the
centerline of Chestnut street to the point of beginning.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2